Illinois, session 104th, HB1230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 9.21 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.21 new)7    Sec. 9.21. Air Quality Enforcement and Mitigation Fund; 8Program.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Environmental protection community" means a geographic 11area that the Agency, using tools such as the United States 12Environmental Protection Agency's EJSCREEN, has identified as 13a community facing a disproportionate environmental burden, 14using indicators such as sensitive populations, socioeconomic 15factors, and environmental exposures and effects.16    "Fund" means the Air Quality Enforcement and Mitigation 17Fund created under subsection (b).18    "Program" means the Air Quality Community Impact Grant 19Program created under subsection (d). 20    (b) The Air Quality Enforcement and Mitigation Fund is 21created as a special fund in the State treasury. The State 22Treasurer may receive moneys or other assets from any source 23for deposit into the Fund. The State Treasurer shall direct   HB1230- 2 -LRB104 05860 BDA 15891 b1the investment of the Fund. The State Treasurer shall credit 2to the Fund interest and earnings from Fund investments. 3Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Fund is not 4subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs, or any other 5fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would in any way transfer 6any amounts from the Fund into any other fund of the State.7    (c) The Agency shall expend moneys from the Fund, subject 8to appropriation, as follows:9        (1) 30% of the moneys shall be expended for staffing 10    and other functions of the Agency that benefit 11    environmental protection communities and are related to 12    one or more of the following: 13            (A) mitigating air pollution through vegetative 14        buffering, optional residential property buyouts, air 15        filter installation in homes and schools, and diesel 16        engine retrofit or replacement programs;17            (B) increasing air monitoring;18            (C) improving compliance by persons with a history 19        of violating the Act, rules adopted under the Act, or 20        permits issued under the Act; and21            (D) offering education and training programs for 22        environmental regulators, prosecuting attorneys, or 23        both; and24        (2) 70% of the moneys shall be expended for grants, 25    through the Air Quality Community Impact Grant Program 26    established under subsection (d), to nonprofit entities,   HB1230- 3 -LRB104 05860 BDA 15891 b1    local health departments, local environmental departments, 2    and school districts located within communities in which a 3    violation of the Act has occurred or within communities 4    deemed by the Agency to be effected by a violation of the 5    Act, including, but not limited to, environmental 6    protection communities, for the purposes described in 7    subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) and any one or 8    more of the following purposes: 9            (A) conducting health impact assessments; and10            (B) offering education and training programs for 11        community residents and local environmental regulators 12        in order to increase the effectiveness of enforcement 13        programs in deterring violations of this Act and rules 14        adopted or orders issued under this Act. 15    (d) The Agency shall establish an Air Quality Community 16Impact Grant Program. The Program shall provide grants to 17nonprofit entities, local health departments, local 18environmental departments, and school districts to carry out 19the purposes described in paragraph (2) of subsection (c).20    (e) The Agency shall adopt rules to implement this 21Section. At a minimum, the rules shall describe how grants are 22to be allocated, the procedures for applying for grants, the 23criteria for awarding grants, and administrative and fiscal 24requirements governing the receipt and expenditure of grants. 25The Agency shall adopt the rules in consultation with an 26Advisory Committee that shall include, but shall not be   HB1230- 4 -LRB104 05860 BDA 15891 b1limited to, at least one of each of the following persons 2appointed by the Director of the Agency: 3        (1) a public health expert;4        (2) a representative of an environmental justice 5    organization;6        (3) a representative of the Department of Human 7    Services;8        (4) a representative of a local health department or 9    local environmental department; and10        (5) two residents of environmental protection 11    communities. 12    (f) The Agency, in collaboration with environmental 13interest groups, shall, by rule, develop a process to identify 14environmental protection communities. Within 150 days after 15the effective date of those rules, the Agency shall use 16available census block data from the most recent federal 17decennial census to identify environmental protection 18communities. The identification process shall include 19community engagement to obtain information and receive 20feedback.21    (g) The Agency shall post on its website and make publicly 22available an annual report on the purposes for which grants 23were awarded under paragraph (2) of subsection (c), including 24the communities affected.  25    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding   HB1230- 5 -LRB104 05860 BDA 15891 b1Section 5.1030 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)3    Sec. 5.1030. The Air Quality Enforcement and Mitigation 4Fund.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.